Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Board of Directors.

§79-4-8.01.
Requirement for Board of Directors; exception; duties of Board.

Except as provided in Section 79-4-7.32, each corporation must have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of the board of directors of the corporation, and the business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction, and subject to the oversight, of its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the articles of incorporation or in an agreement authorized under Section 79-4-7.32.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.01; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 14, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2001 amendment inserted “by or” following “managed” in (b).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (b), inserted “the board of directors of the corporation” preceding “and the business and affairs of the corporation”, inserted “shall be” thereafter, and “and subject to the oversight” preceding “of its board of directors.”

Authority of committees to exercise authority of board of directors under this section, see § 79-4-8.25.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation by board of directors and shareholders, see § 79-4-14.02.

Revocation of dissolution, see § 79-4-14.04.

Deadlock among shareholders in electing directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Director of corporation entitled to inspect and copy the books, records and documents of the corporation, see § 79-4-16.05.

Requirement for and duties of board of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-231.

In a close corporation where a majority stockholder stands to benefit as a controlling stockholder, the majority’s action must be “intrinsically fair” to the minority interest. Thus, stockholders in close corporations must bear towards each other the same relationship of trust and confidence which prevails in partnerships, rather than resort to statutory defenses. This does not mean that directors, executive officers and stockholders are not required to adhere to the corporate statutes; rather, blind adherence to corporate statutes may not be used to circumvent the corporation’s by-laws, charter or various agreements, such as a stock redemption agreement, because of the “intrinsically fair” standard that is now adopted. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

Generally, a director violates no duty by dealing in his or her own stock on his or her own account. This rule is not applicable, however, when there is a showing that a closely-held corporation has a practice of purchasing its own stock, or that it ever contemplated doing so, as evidenced by a stock redemption agreement, in order to maintain proportionate control of the corporation. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

The management of a corporation is vested in its board of directors and not the stockholders. Harper v. Harper, 491 So. 2d 189, 1986 Miss. LEXIS 2508 (Miss. 1986).

If owners of stock in a restaurant were also directors of the corporation, they may have had the power to obtain a loss payable clause in an insurance policy on the restaurant, such clause naming them as payees of insurance proceeds to the extent of the amount of their actual interest in the restaurant. Cherokee Ins. Co. v. Koenenn, 536 F.2d 585, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 7720 (5th Cir. Miss. 1976).

A director of a corporation occupies a fiduciary position toward creditors, having a better knowledge of the condition of the company than have other creditors, and should not be permitted to use that position to benefit himself at their expense or to grant himself preferences or advantages in the payment of his claims over other creditors. Cooper v. Mississippi Land Co., 220 So. 2d 302, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1451 (Miss. 1969).

Provision authorizing directors to fill vacancies as applicable to newly created directorships.
6 A.L.R.2d 174.

Purchase of claims against corporation by officer or director thereof.
13 A.L.R.2d 1172.

Corporation as necessary or proper party defendant in proceedings to determine validity of election or appointment of corporate director or officer.
21 A.L.R.2d 1048.

Validity of security for contemporaneous loan to corporation by officer, director, or stockholder.
31 A.L.R.2d 663.

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by directors or officers in common.
33 A.L.R.2d 1060.

Statute of frauds: promise by stockholder, officer, or director to pay debt of corporation. 35 A.L.R.2d 906.

Allowance, as taxable costs, of witness fees and mileage of stockholders, directors, officers, and employees of corporate litigant.
57 A.L.R.2d 1243.

Personal liability of one who signs or indorses without qualification commercial paper of corporation.
82 A.L.R.2d 424.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors.
3 A.L.R.3d 623.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Validity of agreement, in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees.
13 A.L.R.3d 361.

Liability of corporate directors for negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcations by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

Liability of corporate directors or officers for negligence in permitting conversion of property of third persons by corporation.
29 A.L.R.3d 660.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

Liability of corporate officer or director for commission or compensation received from third person in connection with that person’s transaction with corporation.
47 A.L.R.3d 373.

Who has possession, custody, or control of corporate books or records for purposes of order to produce.
47 A.L.R.3d 676.

Personal liability of officers or directors or corporation on corporate checks issued against insufficient funds.
47 A.L.R.3d 1250.

Insurance: construction of policy or bond indemnifying directors or officers of corporations for expenses incurred in defending actions brought against them in their capacity as such.
49 A.L.R.3d 1250.

Test in stockholders’ actions as to reasonableness of compensation of corporate officers who as directors determine own compensation.
53 A.L.R.3d 358.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

Liability of corporate director, officer, or employee for tortious interference with corporation’s contract with another.
72 A.L.R.4th 492.

Time for bringing suit to recover insider short-swing profits under sec. 16(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 ( 15 USCS sec. 78p(b)).
67 A.L.R. Fed. 849.

Proper measure and elements of recovery for insider short-swing transaction.
86 A.L.R. Fed. 16.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1166 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1051 et seq., 74:1353 et seq.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 822 et seq.

Transactions between a corporation and its directors: Where does Mississippi stand?
52 Miss. L. J. 877, December, 1982.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-8.02.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.02; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Qualifications of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-231.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1176 et seq.

6AAm. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1055 et seq.

§79-4-8.03.
Number and election of directors.

A board of directors must consist of one or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased, from time to time, by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under Section 79-4-8.06.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.03; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment rewrote (b); deleted former (c); and redesignated former (d) as present (c).

Number and election of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-235, 79-11-237.

Corporation as necessary or proper party defendant in proceedings to determine validity of election or appointment of corporate director or officer.
21 A.L.R.2d 1048.

Construction, application, and effect of constitutional provisions or statutes relating to cumulative voting of stock for corporate directors. 43 A.L.R.2d 1322.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors.
3 A.L.R.3d 623.

Validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees. 13 A.L.R.3d 361.

Corporations: casting ballots after closing of polls. 41 A.L.R.3d 234.

Corporations: power of inspectors of election relating to irregular or conflicting proxies. 44 A.L.R.3d 1443.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1174, 1175, 1183 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1051-74:1053, 74:1353-74:1354, 74:1357-74:1361.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 797 et seq.

§79-4-8.04.
Election of directors by authorized classes of shares.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes of shares. Each class (or classes) of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Authorizing shares generally, see § 79-4-6.01.

Election of directors generally, see § 79-4-8.03.

Number and election of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-235, 79-11-237.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1184, 1185, 1187 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1015-74:1018, 74:1061.

§79-4-8.05.
Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors expire at the next, or if their terms are staggered in accordance with Section 79-4-8.06, at the applicable second or third, annual shareholders’ meeting following their election.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires at the next shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, he continues to serve until his successor is elected and qualifies or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.05; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 15, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (b).

Vacancy on board generally, see § 79-4-8.10.

Terms of office of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-239, 79-11-241.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1212-1217.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1064, 74:1065.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 811-814.

§79-4-8.06.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two (2) or three (3) groups, with each group containing one-half (1/2) or one-third (1/3) of the total, as near as may be practicable. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders’ meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders’ meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term of two (2) years or three (3) years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.06; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 16, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2001 amendment deleted “If there are nine (9) or more directors” at the beginning, and substituted “the terms of directors” for “their terms” following “staggering.”

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added “practicable” at the end of the first sentence.

Election of directors whose terms of office are not staggered pursuant to this section, see § 79-4-8.03.

Terms of directors whose terms of office are not staggered pursuant to this section, see § 79-4-8.05.

Terms of office of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-239, 79-11-241.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1215, 1216.

§79-4-8.07.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, or its chair or to the secretary of the corporation.

A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.07; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 17, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “or its chair or to the secretary of the corporation” for “its chairmen or to the corporation” at the end of (a).

Term of director elected to fill vacancy, see § 79-4-8.05.

Authority to fill vacancy that will occur at specified later date before vacancy occurs, see § 79-4-8.10.

Resignation of director under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-243.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1233-1240.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1070, 74:1380-74:1386.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 815.

§79-4-8.08.
Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove him.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect him under cumulative voting is voted against his removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove him exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove him.

A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing him and the meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.08; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Voting groups, see §§ 79-4-7.25, 79-4-7.26.

Cumulative voting generally, see § 79-4-7.28.

Removal of director by judicial proceeding, see § 79-4-8.09.

Removal of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-245 through 79-11-249.

Validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees. 13 A.L.R.3d 361.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1247 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1071, 74:1372-74:1373.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 817.

Corporations. 25 SC L Rev 422.

§79-4-8.09.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that (1) the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation, and (2) removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If shareholders commence a proceeding under subsection (a), they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.09; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 30, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013,
in (a), deleted “(or, if none in this state, its registered office)” preceding “is located” and added “or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” thereafter.

Term of director elected to fill vacancy, see § 79-4-8.05.

Removal of director by shareholders, see § 79-4-8.08.

Removal of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-245 through 79-11-249.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 34 A.L.R.4th 13.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1247-1253.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1371-74:1373.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 817.

§79-4-8.10.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders and only the directors elected by that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the director.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under Section 79-4-8.07(b) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.10; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 18, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added “and only the directors elected by that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the director” at the end of (b).

Voting groups, see §§ 79-4-7.25, 79-4-7.26.

Election of directors whose terms of office are not staggered, see § 79-4-8.03.

Term of director elected to fill vacancy, see § 79-4-8.05.

Staggered terms of directors, see § 79-4-8.06.

Committees created by board of directors not authorized to fill vacancies on the board of directors, see § 79-4-8.25.

Filling vacancy on board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-251.

Provision authorizing directors to fill vacancies as applicable to newly created directorships.
6 A.L.R.2d 174.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1218.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1075-74:1077.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 797.

§79-4-8.11.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.11, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Compensation of directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-253.

Reasonableness of compensation paid to officers or employees, so as to warrant deduction thereof in computing employer’s income tax. 10 A.L.R.3d 125.

Test of stockholders’ actions as to reasonableness of compensation of corporate officers who as directors determine own compensation. 53 A.L.R.3d 358.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1655 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1135-74:1138, 74:1550.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 351 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 425, Reasonableness of Corporate Officer’s Compensation.